test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-a_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - sollâ:
    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: sollâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Acc: soolâ
    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: sooḷân
    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: soolâst
    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: sooláin
    sollâ+N+Sg+Abe: soˊlâttáá
    sollâ+N+Ess: sollân
    sollâ+N+Par: sollâd
    sollâ+N+Pl+Nom: soolah
    sollâ+N+Pl+Gen: [soolâi, soˊlâi]
    sollâ+N+Pl+Acc: soolâid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Ill: sooláid
    sollâ+N+Pl+Loc: soolâin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Com: soˊlâiguin
    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: soˊlâittáá


  Noun - roppâ:
    roppâ+N+Sg+Nom: roppâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Gen: roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Acc: roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Ill: roopân
    roppâ+N+Sg+Loc: roopâst
    roppâ+N+Sg+Com: roppáin
    roppâ+N+Sg+Abe: roˊpâttáá
    roppâ+N+Ess: roppân
    roppâ+N+Par: roppâd
    roppâ+N+Pl+Nom: roopah
    roppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roopâi, roˊpâi]
    roppâ+N+Pl+Acc: roopâid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Ill: roppáid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Loc: roopâin
    roppâ+N+Pl+Com: roˊpâiguin
    roppâ+N+Pl+Abe: roˊpâittáá


  Noun - puddâ:
    puddâ+N+Sg+Nom: puddâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Gen: puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Acc: puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Ill: puudân
    puddâ+N+Sg+Loc: puudâst
    puddâ+N+Sg+Com: puddáin
    puddâ+N+Sg+Abe: puˊdâttáá
    puddâ+N+Ess: puddân
    puddâ+N+Par: puddâd
    puddâ+N+Pl+Nom: puudah
    puddâ+N+Pl+Acc: [puudâi, puˊdâi]
    puddâ+N+Pl+Acc: puudâid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Ill: puddáid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Loc: puudâin
    puddâ+N+Pl+Com: puˊdâiguin
    puddâ+N+Pl+Abe: puˊdâittáá

  Noun - rippâ:
    rippâ+N+Sg+Nom: rippâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Gen: riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Acc: riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Ill: riipân
    rippâ+N+Sg+Loc: riipâst
    rippâ+N+Sg+Com: rippáin
    rippâ+N+Sg+Abe: riˊpâttáá
    rippâ+N+Ess: rippân
    rippâ+N+Par: rippâd
    rippâ+N+Pl+Nom: riipah
    rippâ+N+Pl+Gen: [riipâi, riˊpâi]
    rippâ+N+Pl+Acc: riipâid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Ill: rippáid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Loc: riipâin
    rippâ+N+Pl+Com: riˊpâiguin
    rippâ+N+Pl+Abe: riˊpâittáá

  Noun - skammâ:
    skammâ+N+Sg+Nom: skammâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Gen: skaamâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Acc: skaamâ
    skammâ+N+Sg+Ill: skaamân
    skammâ+N+Sg+Loc: skaamâst
    skammâ+N+Sg+Com: skammáin
    skammâ+N+Sg+Abe: skaˊmâttáá
    skammâ+N+Ess: skammân
    skammâ+N+Par: skammâd
    skammâ+N+Pl+Nom: skaamah
    skammâ+N+Pl+Gen: [skaamâi, skaˊmâi]
    skammâ+N+Pl+Acc: skaamâid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Ill: skammáid
    skammâ+N+Pl+Loc: skaamâin
    skammâ+N+Pl+Com: skaˊmâiguin
    skammâ+N+Pl+Abe: skaˊmâittáá

  Noun - lekkâ:
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Nom: lekkâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Gen: leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Acc: leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Ill: leekân
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Loc: leehâst
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Com: lehháin
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Abe: leˊhâttáá
    lekkâ+N+Ess: lekkân
    lekkâ+N+Par: lekkâd
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Nom: leehah
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [leehâi, leˊhâi]
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Acc: leehâid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Ill: lehháid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Loc: leehâin
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Com: leˊhâiguin
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Abe: leˊhâittáá


  Noun - kussâ:
    kussâ+N+Sg+Nom: kussâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuusâ
    kussâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuusân # lâi: kuus7ân
    kussâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuusâst
    kussâ+N+Sg+Com: kussáin
    kussâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuˊsâttáá
    kussâ+N+Ess: kussân
    kussâ+N+Par: kussâd
    kussâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuusah
    kussâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuusâi, kuˊsâi]
    kussâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuusâid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Ill: kussáid
    kussâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuusâin
    kussâ+N+Pl+Com: kuˊsâiguin
    kussâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuˊsâittáá

  Noun - kielâ:
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kieḷâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Acc: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kieḷân
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe: kieˊlâttáá
    kielâ+N+Ess: kiellân
    kielâ+N+Par: kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom: kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kielâi,kieˊlâi]
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc: kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill: kieláid 
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc: kielâin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com: kieˊlâiguin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊlâittáá


  Noun - kiehâ:
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Nom: kiehâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Gen: kieṿâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Acc: kieṿâ
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Ill: kiehân
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Loc: kieṿâst
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Com: kievváin
    kiehâ+N+Sg+Abe: kieˊṿâttáá
    kiehâ+N+Ess: kiehân
    kiehâ+N+Par: kiehâd
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Nom: kieṿah
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kieṿâi,kieˊṿâi]
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Acc: kieṿâid
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Ill: kievváid 
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Loc: kieṿâin
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Com: kieˊṿâiguin
    kiehâ+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊṿâittáá


  Noun - njuolâ:
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuoḷâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuoḷân
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuolâst
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoláin
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuoˊlâttáá
    njuolâ+N+Ess: njuollân
    njuolâ+N+Par: njuollâd
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuolah
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [njuolâi,njuoˊlâi]
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuolâid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoláid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuolâin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Com: njuoˊlâiguin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuoˊlâittáá

  Noun - moolâ:
    moolâ+N+Sg+Nom: mooḷâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Gen: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Acc: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Ill: mooḷân
    moolâ+N+Sg+Loc: moolâst
    moolâ+N+Sg+Com: mooláin
    moolâ+N+Sg+Abe: moˊlâttáá
    moolâ+N+Ess: moollân
    moolâ+N+Par: moollâd
    moolâ+N+Pl+Nom: moolah
    moolâ+N+Pl+Gen: [moolâi, moˊlâi]
    moolâ+N+Pl+Acc: moolâid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Ill: mooláid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Loc: moolâin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Com: moˊlâiguin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Abe: moˊlâittáá
    
  
  
  Noun - pieggâ:
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Nom: piegˊgâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Gen: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Acc: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Ill: piegân
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Loc: piegâst
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Com: piegˊgáin
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Abe: pieˊgâttáá
    pieggâ+N+Ess: piegˊgân
    pieggâ+N+Par: piegˊgâd
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Nom: piegah
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Gen: [piegâi, pieˊgâi]
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Acc: piegâid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Ill: piegˊgáid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Loc: piegâin
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Com: pieˊgâiguin
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Abe: pieˊgâittáá
  


  Noun - algâ:
    algâ+N+Sg+Nom: algâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Gen: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Acc: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Ill: aalgân
    algâ+N+Sg+Loc: aalgâst
    algâ+N+Sg+Com: algáin
    algâ+N+Sg+Abe: aˊlgâttáá
    algâ+N+Ess: algân
    algâ+N+Par: algâd
    algâ+N+Pl+Nom: aalgah
    algâ+N+Pl+Gen: [aalgâi, aˊlgâi]
    algâ+N+Pl+Acc: aalgâid
    algâ+N+Pl+Ill: algáid
    algâ+N+Pl+Loc: aalgâin
    algâ+N+Pl+Com: aˊlgâiguin
    algâ+N+Pl+Abe: aˊlgâittáá

  Noun - ristâ:
    ristâ+N+Sg+Nom: ristâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Gen: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Acc: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Ill: riistân
    ristâ+N+Sg+Loc: riistâst
    ristâ+N+Sg+Com: ristáin
    ristâ+N+Sg+Abe: riˊstâttáá
    ristâ+N+Ess: ristân
    ristâ+N+Par: ristâd
    ristâ+N+Pl+Nom: riistah
    ristâ+N+Pl+Gen: [riistâi, riˊstâi]
    ristâ+N+Pl+Acc: riistâid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Ill: ristáid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Loc: riistâin
    ristâ+N+Pl+Com: riˊstâiguin
    ristâ+N+Pl+Abe: riˊstâittáá

  Noun - kolbâ:
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Nom: kolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Gen: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Acc: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Ill: koolbân
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Loc: koolbâst
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Com: kolbáin
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Abe: koˊlbâttáá
    kolbâ+N+Ess: kolbân
    kolbâ+N+Par: kolbâd
    ristâ+N+Pl+Nom: koolbah
    ristâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koolbâi, koˊlbâi]
    ristâ+N+Pl+Acc: koolbâid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Ill: kolbáid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Loc: koolbâin
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Com: koˊlbâiguin
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Abe: koˊlbâittáá

  Noun - muršâ:
    muršâ+N+Sg+Nom: muršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Gen: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Acc: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Ill: muuršân
    muršâ+N+Sg+Loc: muuršâst
    muršâ+N+Sg+Com: muršáin
    muršâ+N+Sg+Abe: muˊršâttáá
    muršâ+N+Ess: muršân
    muršâ+N+Par: muršâd
    muršâ+N+Pl+Nom: muuršah
    muršâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muuršâi, muˊršâi]
    muršâ+N+Pl+Acc: muuršâid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Ill: muršáid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Loc: muuršâin
    muršâ+N+Pl+Com: muˊršâiguin
    muršâ+N+Pl+Abe: muˊršâittáá

  Noun - rytmâ:
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Nom: rytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Gen: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Acc: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Ill: ryytmân
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Loc: ryytmâst
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Com: rytmáin
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Abe: ryˊtmâttáá
    rytmâ+N+Ess: rytmân
    rytmâ+N+Par: rytmâd
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Nom: ryytmah
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ryytmâi, ryˊtmâi]
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Acc: ryytmâid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Ill: rytmáid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Loc: ryytmâin
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Com: ryˊtmâiguin
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Abe: ryˊtmâittáá

  Noun - nieidâ:
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Nom: nieiˊdâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Gen: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Acc: nieidâ
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Ill: nieidân
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Loc: nieidâst
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Com: nieiˊdáin
    nieidâ+N+Sg+Abe: nieˊidâttáá
    nieidâ+N+Ess: nieiˊdân
    nieidâ+N+Par: nieiˊdâd
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Nom: nieidah
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Gen: [nieidâi, nieˊidâi]
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Acc: nieidâid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Ill: nieiˊdáid
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Loc: nieidâin
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Com: nieˊidâiguin
    nieidâ+N+Pl+Abe: nieˊidâittáá

  Noun - ruoidâ:
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruoiˊdâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruoidâ
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruoidân
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruoidâst
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Com: ruoiˊdáin
    ruoidâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruoˊidâttáá
    ruoidâ+N+Ess: ruoiˊdân
    ruoidâ+N+Par: ruoiˊdâd
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruoidah
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruoidâi, ruoˊidâi]
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruoidâid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruoiˊdáid
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruoidâin
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Com: ruoˊidâiguin
    ruoidâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruoˊidâittáá


  Noun - njuhčâ:
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuhčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuuvčâ
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuuvčâst
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Com: njuvččáin
    njuhčâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuˊvčâttáá
    njuhčâ+N+Ess: njuhčân
    njuhčâ+N+Par: njuhčâd
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuuvčah
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Gen: [njuuvčâi, njuˊvčâi]
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuuvčâid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuvččáid
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuuvčâin
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Com: njuˊvčâiguin
    njuhčâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuˊvčâittáá

  Noun - kiksâ:
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Nom: kiksâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Gen: kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Acc: kiivsâ
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Ill: kiiksân
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Loc: kiivsâst
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Com: kivssáin
    kiksâ+N+Sg+Abe: kiˊvsâttáá
    kiksâ+N+Ess: kiksân
    kiksâ+N+Par: kiksâd
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Nom: kiivsah
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kiivsâi, kiˊvsâi]
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Acc: kiivsâid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Ill: kivssáid
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Loc: kiivsâin
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Com: kiˊvsâiguin
    kiksâ+N+Pl+Abe: kiˊvsâittáá

  Noun - vahtâ:
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Nom: vahtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaavtâ
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaahtân
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaavtâst
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Com: vavttáin
    vahtâ+N+Sg+Abe: vaˊvtâttáá
    vahtâ+N+Ess: vahtân
    vahtâ+N+Par: vahtâd
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaavtah
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaavtâi, vaˊvtâi]
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaavtâid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Ill: vavttáid
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaavtâin
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Com: vaˊvtâiguin
    vahtâ+N+Pl+Abe: vaˊvtâittáá

  Noun - lahcâ:
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Nom: lahcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahcân
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavcâst
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Com: lavccáin
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Abe: laˊvcâttáá
    lahcâ+N+Ess: lahcân
    lahcâ+N+Par: lahcâd
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavcah
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavcâi, laˊvcâi]
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavcâid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavccáid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavcâin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Com: laˊvcâiguin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Abe: laˊvcâittáá

  Noun - tekstâ:
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Nom: tekstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Gen: teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Acc: teevstâ
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Ill: teekstân
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Loc: teevstâst
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Com: tevstáin
    tekstâ+N+Sg+Abe: teˊvstâttáá
    tekstâ+N+Ess: tekstân
    tekstâ+N+Par: tekstâd
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Nom: teevstah
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Gen: [teevstâi, teˊvstâi]
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Acc: teevstâid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Ill: tevstáid
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Loc: teevstâin
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Com: teˊvstâiguin
    tekstâ+N+Pl+Abe: teˊvstâittáá
